Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-416
Statement of denial.

A partner or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority or in a list maintained by an agent pursuant to subsection (2) of section 67-415 may file a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person's authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of section 67-415.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 16.